Florida, session 2026, SB1056.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âSection 316.19361, Florida Statutes, is created 19 to read: 20 316.19361âPossession of open containers of edibles, hemp, 21 hemp extract, low-THC cannabis, marijuana, or THC beverages in 22 vehicles prohibited; penalties.â 23 (1)âAs used in this section and s. 316.19362, the term: 24 (a)ââEdiblesâ has the same meaning as in s. 381.986(1). 25 (b)ââHempâ has the same meaning as in s. 581.217(3). 26 (c)ââHemp extractâ has the same meaning as in s. 27 581.217(3). 28 (d)ââLow-THC cannabisâ has the same meaning as in s. 29 381.986(1). 30 (e)ââMarijuanaâ has the same meaning as in s. 381.986(1). 31 (f)ââOpen containerâ has the same meaning as in s. 32 316.1936(1). 33 (g)ââQualified patientâ has the same meaning as in s. 34 381.986(1). 35 (h)ââRoadâ has the same meaning as in s. 316.1936(1). 36 (i)ââTHC beverageâ means a beverage infused with hemp, hemp 37 extract, or low-THC cannabis. 38 (2)(a)âIt is unlawful for any person to possess an open 39 container of edibles, hemp, hemp extract, low-THC cannabis, 40 marijuana, or THC beverage while operating a vehicle in this 41 state or while a passenger in or on a vehicle being operated in 42 this state. 43 (b)âIt is unlawful for any person to possess an open 44 container of edibles, hemp, hemp extract, low-THC cannabis, 45 marijuana, or THC beverage while seated in or on a motor vehicle 46 that is parked or stopped within a road. This paragraph does not 47 apply to passengers in vehicles designed, maintained, and used 48 primarily for the transportation of persons for compensation or 49 in motor homes. 50 (3)âAn open container of edibles, hemp, hemp extract, low 51 THC cannabis, marijuana, or THC beverage is considered to be in 52 the possession of the operator of a vehicle if the open 53 container of such product is not in the possession of a 54 passenger and is not located in a locked glove compartment, 55 locked trunk, or other locked nonpassenger area of the vehicle. 56 (4)âAn open container of edibles, hemp, hemp extract, low 57 THC cannabis, marijuana, or THC beverage is considered to be in 58 the possession of a passenger of a vehicle if the open container 59 of such product is in the physical control of the passenger. 60 (5)âThis section does not apply to: 61 (a)âA passenger of a vehicle in which the driver is 62 operating the vehicle pursuant to a contract to provide 63 transportation for passengers, and such driver holds a valid 64 commercial driver license with a passenger endorsement issued in 65 accordance with the requirements of chapter 322; 66 (b)âA passenger of a bus in which the driver holds a valid 67 commercial driver license with a passenger endorsement issued in 68 accordance with the requirements of chapter 322; or 69 (c)âA passenger of a self-contained motor home that is 70 longer than 21 feet. 71 (6)(a)âAn operator of a vehicle who violates this section 72 commits a noncriminal moving traffic violation, punishable as 73 provided in chapter 318. If the operator is a qualified patient, 74 his or her identification card shall be suspended. 75 (b)âA second offense is punishable by imprisonment for not 76 more than 90 days or by a fine of at least $25 but not more than 77 $500, or by both such fine and imprisonment. If the operator is 78 a qualified patient, his or her identification card shall be 79 permanently revoked. 80 (c)âA third or subsequent offense is punishable by 81 imprisonment for not more than 6 months or by a fine of at least 82 $50 but not more than $1,000, or by both such fine and 83 imprisonment. 84 (7)âA passenger of a vehicle who violates this section 85 commits a noncriminal moving traffic violation, punishable as 86 provided in chapter 318. If the passenger is a qualified 87 patient, his or her identification card shall be suspended for a 88 first offense and permanently revoked for a second offense. 89 (8)âA county or municipality may adopt an ordinance that 90 imposes more stringent restrictions than those imposed by this 91 section on the possession of edibles, hemp, hemp extract, low 92 THC cannabis, marijuana, or THC beverages in vehicles. 93 (9)âThis section does not prohibit the enforcement of s. 94 316.302. 95 Section 2.âSection 316.19362, Florida Statutes, is created 96 to read: 97 316.19362âLegislative intent; edibles, hemp, hemp extract, 98 low-THC cannabis, marijuana, or THC beverages.âIt is the express 99 intent of the Legislature that the âplain smellâ of edibles, 100 hemp, hemp extract, low-THC cannabis, marijuana, or THC 101 beverages constitutes probable cause for a vehicle search. 102 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.